Hawaii statutes.
§286-209 Safety inspection of motor carrier
vehicles. (a) Motor carrier vehicles, including but not limited to
trucks, truck-tractors, semitrailers, trailers, or pole trailers, having a
gross vehicle weight rating of more than ten thousand pounds, motor carrier
vehicles having a gross vehicle weight rating of ten thousand pounds or less
which transport passengers in the furtherance of a commercial enterprise,
including car rental transport vehicles, and motor carrier vehicles used in
transporting material found by the United States Secretary of Transportation to
be hazardous under 49 U.S.C. section 5103 and transported in a quantity
requiring placarding under 49 C.F.R., subtitle B, chapter I, subchapter C,
shall be inspected and certified annually.

(b) The director shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 for motor carrier vehicle safety inspections, the issuance of
certificates of safety inspection, the affixing of motor carrier vehicle safety
inspection decals, and the acceptance of certificates of safety inspection
issued in other jurisdictions.

(c) The director shall collect a fee of $1.50
for each motor carrier vehicle safety inspection decal issued by motor carrier
vehicle inspection stations. All moneys collected shall be paid into the state
highway fund.

(d) A fee of no more than $12 shall be charged
by a motor carrier inspection station for each safety inspection performed.

(e) For the purposes of this section,
"car rental transport vehicles" means motor carrier vehicles used to
transport customers to or from car rental sites. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, pt of
§1; am L 1985, c 246, §1 and c 274, §1; am L 2002, c 138, §2; am L 2005, c 3,
§1; am L 2007, c 43, §1; am L 2010, c 14, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next